Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB965.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 5(f) of the act of December 19, 1990 (P.L.1200, No.202), known as the Solicitation of Funds for Charitable Purposes Act, is amended to read:Section 5. Registration of charitable organizations; financial reports; fees; failure to file.* * *(f) Audit of certain financial reports.--[The] Except as provided under section 9(l), the financial report of every charitable organization which receives annual contributions of [$750,000] $1,000,000 or more shall be audited by an independent 123456789101112131415161718192021 certified public accountant or public accountant. Every charitable organization which receives annual contributions of at least [$250,000] $500,000, but less than [$750,000] $1,000,000, shall be required to have a review or audit of their financial statements performed by an independent certified public accountant or public accountant. Every charitable organization which receives annual contributions of at least [$100,000] $150,000, but less than [$250,000] $500,000, shall be required to have a compilation, review or audit of their financial statements performed by an independent certified public accountant or public accountant. A compilation, audit or review is optional for any charitable organization which receives annual contributions of less than [$100,000] $150,000. Audits shall be performed in accordance with generally accepted auditing standards, including the Statements on Auditing Standards of the American Institute of Certified Public Accountants, whereas reviews shall be performed in accordance with the Statements on Standards for Accounting and Review Services of the American Institute of Certified Public Accountants.* * *Section 2. This act shall apply to contributions received in calendar years beginning after the effective date of this section.Section 3. This act shall take effect immediately.20250HB0965PN1042 - 2 - 12345678910111213141516171819202122232425